Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-1395
Report of sexual harassment to Department of Administrative Services; duties; confidentiality; prohibited actions.

(1) A state employee may make a report of sexual harassment to the Department of Administrative Services. The department shall investigate the report or ensure that an investigation is conducted by the agency which employs the reporting employee.

(2) The department and the agency which employs the reporting employee shall maintain the confidentiality of the reporting employee and any other person making a report of sexual harassment or participating in an investigation or internal agency proceeding under this section except:

(a) When disclosure is authorized in writing by such employee or other person;

(b) The identity of such employee or other person may be disclosed to the individual alleged to have committed the sexual harassment; and

(c) When necessary for conducting the investigation or imposing discipline.

(3) The agency employing the reporting employee shall not retaliate or discriminate against the reporting employee or any other person for:

(a) Initiating or participating in the making of a report of sexual harassment; or

(b) Testifying, assisting, or participating in an investigation, proceeding, or action concerning the sexual harassment.

Laws 2018, LB791, § 5.
April 24, 2018